Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-436
State committee; officers; meetings; quorum.

The state committee shall organize by electing a chairperson and vice-chairperson from its appointive members. The Commissioner of Education shall be secretary of the state committee. Meetings of the state committee shall be held upon the call of the chairperson or any three of the members thereof. A majority of the state committee shall constitute a quorum.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 4, p. 674;

Laws 1955, c. 311, § 2, p. 957;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 185.